Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 2. Transportation Partnership Opportunity Fund.

§ 33.2-1508.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 684, cl. 9.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2015, c. 684, cl. 9 provides: “That Article 2 ( §

33.2-1508

) of Chapter 15 of Title 33.2 of the Code of Virginia is repealed and that such repeal shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any loan agreement or other contract, or any right established or accrued under such loan agreement or contract, that existed prior to such repeal.”